North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-40.
Board to accept gifts and congressional donations.

The Board of Governors shall use, as in its judgment may be proper, for the purposes of the University and for the benefit of education in agriculture and mechanic arts, as well as in furtherance of the powers and duties now or which may hereafter be conferred upon such Board by law, any funds, buildings, lands, laboratories, and other property which may be in its possession. The Board of Governors shall have power to accept and receive on the part of the State, property, personal, real or mixed, and any donations from the United States Congress to the several states and territories for the benefit of agricultural experiment stations or the agricultural and mechanical colleges in connection therewith, and shall expend the amount so received in accordance with the acts of the Congress in relation thereto.

History.

1907, c. 406, s. 6; C.S., s. 5816; 1963, c. 448, s. 8; 1971, c. 1244, s. 9.

§ 116-40.1.
Land scrip fund.

The Board of Governors shall own and hold the certificates of indebtedness, amounting to one hundred and twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000), issued for the principal of the land scrip fund, and the interest thereon shall be paid to them by the State Treasurer semiannually on the first day of July and January in each year for the purpose of aiding in the support of North Carolina State University at Raleigh in accordance with the act of the Congress approved July 2, 1862, entitled, “An act donating public lands to several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts.”

History.

1907, c. 406, s. 8; C.S., s. 5817; 1963, c. 448, s. 8; 1965, c. 213; 1971, c. 1244, s. 9.

§ 116-40.2.
Authorization to purchase insurance in connection with construction and operation of nuclear reactors.

In connection with the construction of, assembling of, use and operation of, any nuclear reactor now owned or hereafter acquired by it, North Carolina State University is hereby authorized and empowered to procure proper insurance against the hazards of explosion, implosion, radiation and any other special hazards unique to nuclear reactors, including nuclear fuel and all other components thereto. Further, North Carolina State University is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States Atomic Energy Commission prerequisite to licensing by that agency of nuclear reactors and to maintain as a part of such agreement or agreements appropriate insurance in amounts required by the Atomic Energy Commission of nuclear reactor licenses.

To the extent that North Carolina State University shall obtain insurance under the provisions of this section, it is hereby authorized and empowered to waive its governmental immunity from liability for damage to property or injury to or death to persons arising from the assembling, construction of, use and operation of nuclear reactors. Such immunity shall be deemed to have been waived by the act of obtaining such insurance, but only to the extent that North Carolina State University is indemnified by such insurance.

Any contract of insurance purchased pursuant to this section must be issued by a company or corporation duly licensed and authorized to do a business of insurance in this State except to the extent that such insurance may be furnished by or through a governmental agency created for the purpose of insuring against such hazards or through reinsurance pools or associations established to insure against such hazards.

Any person sustaining property damage or personal injury may sue North Carolina State University for damages for injury arising out of the construction, assembly, use or operation of a nuclear reactor on the campus of the University in the Superior Court of Wake County, and to the extent that the University is indemnified by insurance, it shall be no defense to any such action that the University was engaged in the performance of a governmental or discretionary function of the University. In the case of death alleged to have been caused by the assembly, construction, use or operation of such nuclear reactor, the personal representative of the deceased person may bring such action.

Nothing in this section shall in any way affect any other actions which have been or may hereafter be brought under the Tort Claims Act against North Carolina State University, nor shall the provisions of this section in any way abrogate or replace the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Act.

History.

1969, c. 1023; 1971, c. 1244, s. 10; 1991, c. 636, s. 3; 1993, c. 553, s. 33.

§ 116-40.3.
Participation in sixth-year program of graduate instruction for superintendents, assistant superintendents, and principals of public schools.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the regulations of any administrative agency the educational institutions of East Carolina University, North Carolina Central University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, Appalachian State University, and Western Carolina University, are hereby authorized and shall be eligible colleges to participate in the sixth-year program adopted by the State Board of Education February 4, 1965, to provide a minimum of 60 semester hours of approved graduate, planned, nonduplicating instruction not beyond the master’s degree for the education of superintendents, assistant superintendents, and principals of public schools. The satisfactory completion of such program and instruction shall qualify a person for the same certificate and stipend as now provided for other eligible educational institutions.

History.

1965, c. 632; 1967, c. 1038; 1969, c. 114, s. 1; c. 608, s. 1; 1971, c. 1244, s. 10.

§ 116-40.4.
School of medicine authorized at East Carolina University; meeting requirements of accrediting agencies.

The Board of Trustees of East Carolina University is hereby authorized to create a school of medicine at East Carolina University, Greenville, North Carolina.

The school of medicine shall meet all requirements and regulations of the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association, the Association of American Medical Colleges, and other such accrediting agencies whose approval is normally required for the establishment and operation of a two-year medical school.

History.

1965, c. 986, ss. 1, 2; 1967, c. 1038; 1971, c. 1244, s. 10.

§ 116-40.5.
Campus law enforcement agencies.

The Board of Trustees of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or of any teaching hospital affiliated with but not part of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Arboretum, may establish a campus law enforcement agency and employ campus police officers. Such officers shall meet the requirements of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes, shall take the oath of office prescribed by Article VI, Section 7 of the Constitution, and shall have all the powers of law enforcement officers generally. The territorial jurisdiction of a campus police officer shall include all property owned or leased to the institution employing the campus police officer and that portion of any public road or highway passing through such property or immediately adjoining it, wherever located.

(a1)

Any teaching hospital having established a campus law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may assign its campus police officers to any other facility within the teaching hospital’s system network. Campus police officers assigned to any other facility within the teaching hospital’s system network pursuant to this subsection shall have the same authority and jurisdiction exclusively upon the premises of the assigned facility, but not upon any portion of any public road or highway passing through the property of the facility or immediately adjoining it, as a campus police officer assigned to a teaching hospital under subsection (a) of this section.

The Board of Trustees of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or of any teaching hospital affiliated with but not part of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Arboretum, having established a campus law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, may enter into joint agreements with the governing board of any municipality to extend the law enforcement authority of campus police officers into any or all of the municipality’s jurisdiction and to determine the circumstances in which this extension of authority may be granted.

The Board of Trustees of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or of any teaching hospital affiliated with but not part of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Arboretum, having established a campus law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, may enter into joint agreements with the governing board of any county, and with the consent of the sheriff, to extend the law enforcement authority of campus police officers into any or all of the county’s jurisdiction and to determine the circumstances in which this extension of authority may be granted.

The Board of Trustees of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Arboretum, having established a campus law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, may enter into joint agreements with the governing board of any other constituent institution of The University of North Carolina to extend the law enforcement authority of its campus police officers into any or all of the other institution’s jurisdiction and to determine the circumstances in which this extension of authority may be granted.

History.

1987, c. 671, s. 2; 1997-194, s. 1; 2001-397, s. 1; 2007-285, s. 1; 2020-74, s. 25.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 2003-329, s. 2.

§ 116-40.6.
East Carolina University Medical Faculty Practice Plan.

Medical Faculty Practice Plan. — The “Medical Faculty Practice Plan”, a division of the School of Medicine of East Carolina University, operates clinical programs and facilities for the purpose of providing medical care to the general public and training physicians and other health care professionals.

Personnel. — Employees of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan shall be deemed to be employees of the State and shall be subject to all provisions of State law relevant thereto; provided, however, that except as to the provisions of Articles 5, 6, 7, and 14 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes, the provisions of Chapter 126 shall not apply to employees of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan, and the policies and procedures governing the terms and conditions of employment of such employees shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees of East Carolina University; provided, that with respect to such employees as may be members of the faculty of East Carolina University, no such policies and procedures may be inconsistent with policies established by, or adopted pursuant to delegation from, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. Such policies and procedures shall be implemented on behalf of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan by a personnel office maintained by East Carolina University.

The board of trustees shall fix or approve the schedules of pay, expense allowances, and other compensation, and adopt position classification plans for employees of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan.

The board of trustees may adopt or provide for rules and regulations concerning, but not limited to, annual leave, sick leave, special leave with full pay, or with partial pay supplementing workers’ compensation payments for employees injured in accidents arising out of and in the course of employment, working conditions, service awards, and incentive award programs, grounds for dismissal, demotion, or discipline, other personnel policies, and any other measures that promote the hiring and retention of capable, diligent, and effective career employees. However, an employee who has achieved career State employee status as defined by

G.S. 126-1.1

by October 31, 1998, shall not have his or her compensation reduced as a result of this subdivision. Further, an employee who has achieved career State employee status as defined by

G.S. 126-1.1

by October 31, 1998, shall be subject to the rules regarding discipline or discharge that were effective on October 31, 1998, and shall not be subject to the rules regarding discipline or discharge adopted after October 31, 1998.

The board of trustees may prescribe the office hours, workdays, and holidays to be observed by the various offices and departments of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan.

The board of trustees may establish boards, committees, or councils to conduct hearings upon the appeal of employees who have been suspended, demoted, otherwise disciplined, or discharged, to hear employee grievances, or to undertake any other duties relating to personnel administration that the board of trustees may direct.The board of trustees shall submit all initial classification and pay plans, and other rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection to the Office of State Human Resources for review upon adoption by the board. Any subsequent changes to these plans, rules, and policies adopted by the board shall be submitted to the Office of State Human Resources for review. Any comments by the Office of State Human Resources shall be submitted to the Chancellor of East Carolina University and the President of The University of North Carolina.

Purchases. — Notwithstanding the provisions of Articles 3, 3A, and 3C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes to the contrary, the Board of Trustees of East Carolina University shall establish policies and regulations governing the purchasing requirements of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan. These policies and regulations shall provide for requests for proposals, competitive bidding, or purchasing by means other than competitive bidding, contract negotiations, and contract awards for purchasing supplies, materials, equipment, and services which are necessary and appropriate to fulfill the clinical and educational missions of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan. Pursuant to such policies and regulations, purchases for the Medical Faculty Practice Plan shall be effected by a purchasing office maintained by East Carolina University. The board of trustees shall submit all initial policies and regulations adopted under this subsection to the Division of Purchase and Contract for review upon adoption by the board. Any subsequent changes to these policies and regulations adopted by the board shall be submitted to the Division of Purchase and Contract for review. Any comments by the Division of Purchase and Contract shall be submitted to the Chancellor of East Carolina University and to the President of The University of North Carolina.

Property. — The board of trustees shall establish rules and regulations for acquiring or disposing of any interest in real property for the use of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan. These rules and regulations shall include provisions for development of specifications, advertisement, and negotiations with owners for acquisition by purchase, gift, lease, or rental, but not by condemnation or exercise of eminent domain, on behalf of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan. This section does not authorize the board of trustees to encumber real property. Such rules and regulations shall be implemented by a property office maintained by East Carolina University. The board of trustees shall submit all initial rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection to the State Property Office for review upon adoption. Any subsequent changes to these rules and regulations shall be submitted to the State Property Office for review. Any comments by the State Property Office shall be submitted to the Chancellor of East Carolina University and to the President of The University of North Carolina. After review by the Attorney General as to form and after the consummation of any such acquisition, East Carolina University shall promptly file, on behalf of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan, a report concerning the acquisition or disposition with the Governor and Council of State. Acquisitions and dispositions of any interest in real property pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.

Property — Construction. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341(3)

and

G.S. 143-135.1

, the board of trustees shall adopt policies and procedures to be implemented by the administration of East Carolina University, with respect to the design, construction, and renovation of buildings, utilities, and other property developments for the use of the Medical Faculty Practice Plan, requiring the expenditure of public money for:

Conducting the fee negotiations for all design contracts and supervising the letting of all construction and design contracts.

Performing the duties of the Department of Administration, the Office of State Construction, and the State Building Commission under

G.S. 133-1.1(d)

, Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and

G.S. 143-341(3)

.

Using open-end design agreements.

As appropriate, submitting construction documents for review and approval by the Department of Insurance and the Division of Health Service Regulation of the Department of Health and Human Services.

Using the standard contracts for design and construction currently in use for State capital improvement projects by the Office of State Construction of the Department of Administration.The board of trustees shall submit all initial policies and procedures adopted under this subsection to the Office of State Construction for review upon adoption by the board. Any subsequent changes to these policies and procedures adopted by the board shall be submitted to the Office of State Construction for review. Any comments by the Office of State Construction shall be submitted to the Chancellor of East Carolina University and to the President of The University of North Carolina.

History.

1998-212, s. 11.8(f); 1999-252, s. 4(b); 2007-182, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 116-40.7.
Internal auditors.

Internal auditors within The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions shall provide independent reviews and analyses of various functions and programs within The University of North Carolina that will provide management information to promote accountability, integrity, and efficiency within The University of North Carolina.

An internal auditor shall have access to any records, data, or other information of The University of North Carolina or the relevant constituent institution that the internal auditor believes necessary to carry out the internal auditor’s duties.

An internal auditor shall maintain, for 10 years, a complete file of all audit reports and reports of other examinations, investigations, surveys, and reviews issued under the internal auditor’s authority. Audit work papers and other evidence and related supportive material directly pertaining to the work of that auditor’s office shall be retained in accordance with Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. To promote cooperation and avoid unnecessary duplication of audit effort, audit work papers related to issued audit reports shall be, unless otherwise prohibited by law, made available for inspection by duly authorized representatives of the State and federal governments in connection with some matter officially before them. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, or upon subpoena issued by a duly authorized court or court official, audit work papers shall be kept confidential and shall not be open to examination or inspection under

G.S. 132-6

until completion of the audit report that is based on the working paper. Audit reports and the working papers on which they are based shall be public records subject to examination and inspection to the extent that they do not include information that, under State law, is confidential and exempt from Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or would compromise the security systems of The University of North Carolina. At the time that audit working papers are made available for public examination or inspection, the custodian of the audit working paper may redact the name and personally identifying information of a person who has initiated an allegation of (i) a violation of State or federal law or rule or regulation; (ii) fraud; (iii) misappropriation of State resources; (iv) substantial and specific danger to the public health and safety; or (v) gross mismanagement, gross waste of monies, or gross abuse of authority, if that person requests that the person’s name and personally identifying information be kept confidential.

History.

2004-203, s. 46; 2007-372, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-372, s. 3, effective August 19, 2007, applicable to public records existing before, on, or after that date, in subsection (c), rewrote the former last two sentences, and added the present last sentence.

§ 116-40.8.
University of North Carolina at Pembroke designated as North Carolina’s Historically American Indian University.

The University of North Carolina at Pembroke is officially designated as North Carolina’s Historically American Indian University.

History.

2005-153, s. 1.

§ 116-40.9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 6(a), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

2007-323, s. 9.4(a); repealed by 2011-74, s. 6(a), effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-40.10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-74, s. 5(a), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

2007-323, s. 9.5(a); repealed by 2011-74, s. 5(a), effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-40.11.
Disciplinary proceedings; right to counsel for students and organizations.

Any student enrolled at a constituent institution who is accused of a violation of the disciplinary or conduct rules of the constituent institution shall have the right to be represented, at the student’s expense, by a licensed attorney or nonattorney advocate who may fully participate during any disciplinary procedure or other procedure adopted and used by the constituent institution regarding the alleged violation. However, a student shall not have the right to be represented by a licensed attorney or nonattorney advocate in either of the following circumstances:

If the constituent institution has implemented a “Student Honor Court” which is fully staffed by students to address such violations.

For any allegation of “academic dishonesty” as defined by the constituent institution.

Any student organization officially recognized by a constituent institution that is accused of a violation of the disciplinary or conduct rules of the constituent institution shall have the right to be represented, at the organization’s expense, by a licensed attorney or nonattorney advocate who may fully participate during any disciplinary procedure or other procedure adopted and used by the constituent institution regarding the alleged violation. However, a student organization shall not have the right to be represented by a licensed attorney or nonattorney advocate if the constituent institution has implemented a “Student Honor Court” which is fully staffed by students to address such violations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a right to be represented at a disciplinary proceeding at public expense.

History.

2013-413, s. 6(c).

§ 116-40.12.
Student organizations; rights and recognition.

No constituent institution that grants recognition to any student organization shall deny recognition to a student organization or deny to a student organization access to programs, funding, facilities, or other privileges associated with official recognition otherwise available to another student organization, on the basis of the organization’s exercise of its rights pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

To the extent allowed by State and federal law, a religious or political student organization may, in conformity with the organization’s established written doctrines expressing the organization’s faith or mission, (i) determine that only persons professing the faith or mission of the group, and comporting themselves in conformity with, are qualified to serve as leaders of that organization, (ii) order its internal affairs according to the established written doctrines, and (iii) resolve the organization’s disputes according to the established written doctrines.

History.

2014-28, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to rights and recognition of student organizations at community colleges, see

G.S. 115D-20.2

.

§ 116-40.13.
Authorization to secure liability insurance for alcohol sales.

A constituent institution of The University of North Carolina is authorized to procure insurance to protect against liability arising from or in connection with the sale or serving of alcohol on the constituent institution’s campus or at a facility leased or owned by the constituent institution.

History.

2019-232, s. 1.

§§ 116-40.14 through 116-40.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3A. Management Flexibility for Special Responsibility Constituent Institutions.

§ 116-40.20.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions is one of the State’s most valuable assets. The General Assembly further finds that to provide the best benefit to North Carolina, the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina need special budgeting flexibility in order to maximize resources, to enhance competitiveness with other peer institutions regionally, nationally, and internationally, and to provide the strongest educational and economic opportunity for the citizens of North Carolina.

To ensure the continued preeminence of The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions, it is the intent of the General Assembly to strengthen and improve these assets. The General Assembly commits to responsible stewardship and improvement of The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions as provided by this Part.

History.

2001-424, s. 31.11(a).

§ 116-40.21.
Board of governors may authorize management flexibility.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina may authorize management flexibility for any special responsibility constituent institution as provided by this Part. The procedure for that authorization is the same as that to designate a constituent institution a special responsibility constituent institution under

G.S. 116-30.1

.

History.

2001-424, s. 31.11(a).

§ 116-40.22.
Management flexibility.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term “institution” means a special responsibility constituent institution that is granted management flexibility by the Board of Governors in compliance with this Part.

Appoint and Fix Compensation of Senior Personnel. — Notwithstanding any provision in Chapter 116 of the General Statutes to the contrary, the Board of Trustees of an institution shall, on recommendation of the Chancellor, appoint and fix the compensation of all vice-chancellors, senior academic and administrative officers, and any person having permanent tenure at that institution. No later than January 1, 2002, the Board of Governors shall adopt policies, compensation structures, and pay ranges concerning the appointment and compensation of senior personnel appointed by the Board of Trustees pursuant to this section. Compensation for senior personnel fixed by the Board of Trustees pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the compensation structure, policies, and pay ranges set by the Board of Governors.

Tuition and Fees. — Notwithstanding any provision in Chapter 116 of the General Statutes to the contrary, in addition to any tuition and fees set by the Board of Governors pursuant to G.S. 116-11(7), the Board of Trustees of the institution may recommend to the Board of Governors tuition and fees for program-specific and institution-specific needs at that institution without regard to whether an emergency situation exists and not inconsistent with the actions of the General Assembly. Any tuition and fees set pursuant to this subsection are appropriated for use by the institution. Notwithstanding this subsection, neither the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina nor its Board of Trustees shall impose any tuition or mandatory fee at the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics without the approval of the General Assembly, except as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

Information Technology. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Trustees of an institution shall establish policies and rules governing the planning, acquisition, implementation, and delivery of information technology and telecommunications at the institution. These policies and rules shall provide for security and encryption standards; software standards; hardware standards; acquisition of information technology consulting and contract services; disaster recovery standards; and standards for desktop and server computing, telecommunications, networking, video services, personal digital assistants, and other wireless technologies; and other information technology matters that are necessary and appropriate to fulfill the teaching, educational, research, extension, and service missions of the institution. The Board of Trustees shall submit all initial policies and rules adopted pursuant to this subsection to the Department of Information Technology for review upon adoption by the Board of Trustees. Any subsequent changes to these policies and rules adopted by the Board of Trustees shall be submitted to the Department of Information Technology for review. Any comments by the Department of Information Technology shall be submitted to the Chancellor of that institution.

Electronic Commerce. — The University is authorized to contract with service providers specializing in services offered to institutions of higher learning that offer systems or services under arrangements that provide for the receipt of funds electronically, provided the services are in compliance with the requirements of the payment industry security standards. For any funds collected and remitted to the University that are on deposit with the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 147-77

, the funds shall be subject to the daily deposit requirements of the statute; provided that the State Treasurer may exempt the applicability of the daily deposit requirement for any standard business process resulting in a delay in the University receiving the funds from a service provider, when the exemption is based upon an acceptable business case that demonstrates an overall efficiency to the University and State. Such business case must first be endorsed by The University of North Carolina System Office before submission to the State Treasurer for consideration.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina may approve, upon the recommendation of the Board of Trustees of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics, the imposition of fees not inconsistent with actions of the General Assembly for distance education services provided by the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics to nonresidents and for students participating in extracurricular enrichment programs sponsored by the School.

History.

2001-424, s. 31.11(a); 2006-66, s. 9.11(h); 2006-203, s. 4.1; 2013-360, s. 11.7(a); 2013-375, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 7A.4(j); 2018-12, s. 5.

§ 116-40.23.
Reporting requirement; effective date of reported policies, procedures, and rules.

The Board of Trustees of a special responsibility constituent institution authorized to have management flexibility under this Part shall report to the Board of Governors and to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee any policies, procedures, and rules adopted pursuant to

G.S. 116-40.22

prior to implementation. The report shall be submitted to both at least 30 days before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Board of Governors and shall become effective immediately following that same meeting unless otherwise provided for by the Board of Trustees. Any subsequent changes to the policies, procedures, or rules adopted by the Board of Trustees pursuant to

G.S. 116-40.22

shall be reported to the Board of Governors and to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee in the same manner. Failure of the Board of Governors to accept, review, or otherwise consider the report submitted by the Board of Trustees shall not affect in any manner the effective date of the policies, procedures, and rules contained in the report.

History.

2001-424, s. 31.11(a).

§ 116-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 15.

§ 116-41.1.
Definitions.

As used in this Part:

“Board” means the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina;

“Construction” means acquisition, construction, provision, reconstruction, replacement, extension, improvement or betterment, or any combination thereof;

“Cost,” as applied to a project, shall include the cost of construction (as herein defined), the cost of all labor, materials and equipment, the cost of all lands, property, rights and easements acquired, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the Board, for one year after completion of construction, cost of plans and specifications, surveys and estimates of cost and/or revenues, cost of engineering and legal services, and all other expenses necessary or incident to such construction, administrative expense and such other expenses, including reasonable provisions for initial operating expenses necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized and a reserve for debt service, and any expense incurred by the Board in the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this Part in connection with any of the foregoing items of cost;

“Project” means any undertaking under this Part to acquire, construct or provide service and auxiliary facilities necessary or desirable for the proper and efficient operation of the University Enterprises, either as additions, extensions, improvements or betterments to the University Enterprises or otherwise, including one or more or any combination of any system, facility, plant, works, instrumentality or other property used or useful:

In obtaining, conserving, treating or distributing water for domestic, industrial, sanitation, fire protection or any other public or private use;

For the collection, treatment, purification or disposal of sewage, refuse or wastes;

For the production, generation, transmission or distribution of gas, electricity or heat;

In providing communication facilities including telephone facilities;

In providing storage, service, repair and duplicating facilities;

In improving, extending or adding to the University Enterprises as herein defined; and

In providing other service and auxiliary facilities serving the needs of the students, the staff or the physical plant of the University; and including all plants, works, appurtenances, machinery, equipment and properties, both personal and real, used or useful in connection therewith;

and in the case of the telephone, electric and water systems comprising a part of the University Enterprises such additions, extensions, improvements or betterments thereof as may be necessary or desirable, in the discretion of the Board, to provide service from such systems, where it may be reasonably made available, within the environs of the University, including, without limitation, areas presently served by the University Enterprises in Orange, Durham and Chatham Counties.

“Revenue bonds” or “bonds” means bonds of the University issued by the Board to pay the cost, in whole or in part, of any project pursuant to this Part and the bond resolution or resolutions of the Board; provided, however, that bonds, issued as a separate series which are stated to mature not later than 20 years from their date may be designated “revenue notes” or “notes”;

“Revenues” means the income and receipts derived by or for the account of the University through the charging and collection of service charges;

“Service charges” means rates, fees, rentals or other charges for, or for the right to, the use, occupancy, services or commodities of or furnished by any project, or by any other service or auxiliary facility of the University, including the University Enterprises, any part of the income of which is pledged to the payment of the bonds or the interest thereon;

“University” means the body politic and corporate known and distinguished by the corporate name of the “University of North Carolina” under

G.S. 116-3

;

“University Enterprises” means the following existing facilities, systems, properties, plants, works and instrumentalities located in or near the Town of Chapel Hill, North Carolina, presently in the jurisdiction of and operated by the University; the telephone, electric, heating and water systems, the laundry, Carolina Inn, service and repair shops, the duplicating shop, bookstores and student supply stores, and rental housing properties for faculty members.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 1; 1963, c. 448, s. 16; c. 944, s. 1; 1965, c. 1033, s. 1; 1971, c. 636; c. 1244, s. 16.

Local Modification.

(As to Part 4) University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 865, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to revenue bonds for student housing, see

G.S. 116-175

et seq.